test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ooqj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ǭʼj: # Noun 124 'eng /est ahi/fin' - full paradigm
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Nom: ǭʼj
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Gen: ǭʼj
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Par: ǭʼjõ
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Dat: ǭʼjõn
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Ins: ǭʼjõks
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Ill: ǭʼjõ
     ǭʼj+N+Sg+Ela: ǭʼjstõ
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Nom: ǭʼjd
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Gen: ǭʼjd
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Par: ǭʼjḑi
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Dat: ǭʼjdõn
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Ins: ǭʼjdkõks
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Ill: ǭʼjži
     ǭʼj+N+Pl+Ela: ǭʼjšti
